California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 85.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26152.

A person engaged in commercial cannabis activity, whether licensed or unlicensed, shall not do any of the following:

(a) Advertise or market in a manner that is false or untrue in any material particular, or that, irrespective of falsity, directly, or by ambiguity, omission, or inference, or by the addition of irrelevant, scientific, or technical matter, tends to create a misleading impression.

(b) Publish or disseminate advertising or marketing containing any statement concerning a brand or product that is inconsistent with any statement on the labeling thereof.

(c) Publish or
 disseminate advertising or marketing containing any statement, design, device, or representation which tends to create the impression that the cannabis or industrial hemp originated in a particular place or region, unless the label of the advertised product bears an appellation of origin, and such appellation of origin appears in the advertisement.

(d) Advertise or market on a billboard or similar advertising device located on an interstate highway or on a state highway which crosses the California border.

(e) Advertise or market cannabis or cannabis products in a manner intended to encourage persons under 21 years of age to consume cannabis or cannabis products.

(f) Publish or disseminate advertising or marketing that is
 attractive to children.

(g) Advertise or market cannabis or cannabis products on an advertising sign within 1,000 feet of a daycare center, school providing instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, playground, or youth center.

(h) Publish or disseminate advertising or marketing for unlicensed commercial cannabis activity or for licensed commercial cannabis activity while the licensee’s license is suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 21.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26152.1.

(a) (1) Advertisement and marketing of an integrated cannabis vaporizer, as defined in Section 26122, shall prominently provide in a clear and legible fashion: “An empty integrated cannabis vaporizer shall be properly disposed of as hazardous waste at a household hazardous waste collection facility or other approved facility.” 

(2) Advertisement and marketing of a cannabis cartridge shall prominently provide in a clear and legible fashion: “A spent cannabis cartridge shall be properly disposed of as hazardous waste at a household hazardous waste collection facility or other approved facility.” 

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “authorized facility” means a facility authorized under the hazardous waste control laws under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Advertisement and marketing of a cannabis cartridge and an integrated cannabis vaporizer shall not indicate that a cannabis cartridge or an integrated cannabis vaporizer is disposable nor imply that it may be thrown in the trash or recycling streams.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26152.2.

(a) The Attorney General, on behalf of the people, a city attorney, or a county counsel may bring and maintain an action to redress a violation of subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 26152, or subdivision (b) of Section 111926 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) The Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel who prevails in an action pursuant to this section shall be awarded injunctive relief.

(2) The Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel may also be awarded either or both of the following:

(A) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(B) Civil penalties of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation by a licensed cannabis business or an industrial hemp registrant and not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per violation by an unlicensed cannabis business or an unregistered business engaged in the sale of products that contain industrial hemp.

(3) The remedies provided in this section shall be in addition to any other remedies otherwise provided in any other law.

(c) In determining whether to award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs and civil penalties, and in assessing the amount of any civil penalty, the court shall consider factors the court determines to be relevant, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The gravity of the violation.

(2) The defendant’s good faith, or lack thereof.

(3) The defendant’s history of previous violations.

(d) Civil penalties awarded in an action brought pursuant to this section shall be distributed as described in subdivision (d) of Section 26038.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a defendant shall not be subject to more than one action pursuant to this section in connection with the same, or substantially similar, advertising or marketing.

(2) This subdivision does not prohibit a subsequent action pursuant to this section to redress a recurring or continuing violation of Section 26152 or of Section 111926 of the Health and Safety Code, after the defendant has
 previously been found to have engaged in the same violation of Section 26152 or of Section 111926 of the Health and Safety Code or a substantially similar violation. Such an action may be brought and maintained if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(A) The defendant has previously been found, in an action pursuant to this section, to have violated one or more subdivisions of Section 26152 or subdivision (b) of Section 111926 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The defendant subsequently engages in the same advertising or marketing, or substantially similar advertising or marketing, that was previously found to violate Section 26152 or subdivision (b) of Section 111926 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The subsequent action is limited to advertising or marketing that occurred after entry of judgment in the
 prior action.

(f) (1) The causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by this section are cumulative to each other and to the causes of action, remedies, and penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(2) This section shall not be construed to limit the availability of any cause of action, remedy, or penalty otherwise available under any other law of this state.

(g) (1) This section shall not be construed to limit or otherwise alter, in any way, any other authority conferred by law upon the Attorney General, the department, or any other state or local officer or agency.

(2) An action brought pursuant to this section shall not have preclusive effect upon the Attorney General, the department,
 or any other state or local officer or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 19.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26153.

(a) A licensee shall not give away any amount of cannabis or cannabis products, or any cannabis accessories, as part of a business promotion or other commercial activity.

(b) For
 purposes of this section, the donation of cannabis or cannabis products by a licensee to a patient or the primary caregiver of a patient pursuant to Section 26071 shall not be considered a business promotion or other commercial activity.

(c) For purposes of this section, the provision of cannabis or cannabis products by a licensee pursuant to Section 26153.1 shall not be considered a business promotion or other commercial activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 75.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26153.1.

(a) The Department of Cannabis Control shall adopt regulations to establish a process authorizing licensees to designate cannabis or cannabis products as a trade sample at any time while the cannabis or cannabis product is in the possession of the licensee.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations to establish a definition of trade sample, the quantity of cannabis and cannabis products that may be designated as trade samples, the amount of trade samples that may be provided to a licensee, and any other provisions necessary to implement this section.

(c) Cannabis or
 cannabis products designated as trade samples shall be subject to quality assurance and testing pursuant to Section 26110, and may be returned to cultivators and manufacturers following quality assurance and testing pursuant to Section 26110.

(d) Cannabis or cannabis products designated as trade samples shall be recorded into the track and trace program established pursuant to Section 26067.

(e) Cannabis or cannabis products designated as trade samples shall be labeled with the following: “TRADE SAMPLE. NOT FOR RESALE OR DONATION.” 

(f) Cannabis or cannabis products designated as trade samples shall only be given for targeted advertising to licensees about new or existing cannabis or cannabis products. The department may adopt regulations specifying additional purposes
 of trade samples.

(g) Cannabis or cannabis products designated as trade samples may be transported between any two licensees by an employee of a licensed distributor or microbusiness authorized to engage in distribution, or by a licensee authorized to engage in transportation of cannabis, including a distributor transport-only licensee as established by the department in regulation. Employees transporting trade samples pursuant to this subdivision but outside of a registered vehicle of the licensed distributor or microbusiness shall be subject to possession limits established in Section 11357 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) Cannabis and cannabis products designated as trade samples shall not be provided for any form of payment, consideration, cost, or compensation.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, cannabis and cannabis products designated as trade samples shall comply with all applicable requirements for cultivation, manufacturing, distribution, processing, storing, laboratory testing, quality assurance, packaging, or labeling under this division.

(j) This section shall become effective upon adoption of regulations by the department and no later than January 1, 2023.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may adopt and readopt emergency regulations to implement this section. The provisions of Section 26013 shall be applicable to emergency regulations adopted or readopted pursuant to this section. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health, safety or general welfare.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 76) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 87, Sec. 6.   (SB 160)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative on or before January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26154.

A licensee shall not include on the label of any cannabis or cannabis product or publish or disseminate advertising or marketing containing any health-related statement that is untrue in any particular manner or tends to create a misleading impression as to the effects on health of cannabis consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 88.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26155.

(a) The provisions of subdivision (g) of Section 26152 shall not apply to the placement of advertising signs inside a licensed premises and which are not visible by normal unaided vision from a public place, provided that such advertising signs do not advertise cannabis or cannabis products in a manner intended to encourage persons under 21 years of age to consume cannabis or cannabis products.

(b) This chapter does not apply to any noncommercial speech.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 89.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26156.

The requirements of Section 5272 apply to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 90.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Records [26160. - 26163.]

26160.

(a) A licensee shall keep accurate records of commercial cannabis activity.

(b) All records related to commercial cannabis activity as defined by the department shall be maintained for a minimum of seven years.

(c) The department may examine the records of a licensee and inspect the premises of a licensee as the department, or a state or local agency, deems necessary to perform its duties under this division. All inspections and examinations of records shall be conducted during standard business hours of the licensed facility or at any other reasonable time. Licensees shall provide and deliver records to the department upon request.

(d) Licensees shall keep records identified by the department on the premises of the location licensed. The department may make any examination of the records of any licensee. Licensees shall also provide and deliver copies of documents to the department upon request.

(e) A licensee, or its agent or employee, that refuses, impedes, obstructs, or interferes with an inspection of the premises or records of the licensee pursuant to this section, has engaged in a violation of this division.

(f) If a licensee, or an agent or employee of a licensee, fails to maintain or provide the records required pursuant to this section, the licensee shall be subject to a citation and fine of up to thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per individual violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 77.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26161.

(a) Every sale or transport of cannabis or cannabis products from one licensee to another licensee must be recorded on a sales invoice or receipt. Sales invoices and receipts may be maintained electronically and must be filed in such manner as to be readily accessible for examination by employees of the department or California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and shall not be commingled with invoices covering other commodities.

(b) Each sales invoice required by subdivision (a) shall include the name and address of the seller and shall include the following information:

(1) Name and address of the purchaser.

(2) Date of sale and invoice number.

(3) Kind, quantity, size, and capacity of packages of cannabis or cannabis products sold.

(4) The cost to the purchaser, together with any discount applied
 to the price as shown on the invoice.

(5) The place from which transport of the cannabis or cannabis product was made unless transport was made from the premises of the licensee.

(6) Whether the cannabis or cannabis products are designated for donation to a medicinal cannabis patient.

(7) Any other information specified by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 78.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26161.5.

(a) A licensee shall not disclose a consumer’s personal information to a third party, except to the extent necessary to allow responsibility for payment to be determined and payment to be made or if the consumer has consented to the licensee’s disclosure of the personal information. This section does not prohibit the disclosure of nonpublic personal information to the State of California or a city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this division or a local ordinance.

(b) A licensee shall not discriminate against a consumer, or deny a consumer a product or service, because the consumer has not provided consent, pursuant to subdivision
 (a), to authorize the licensee to disclose the consumer’s nonpublic personal information to a third party not directly related to the transaction.

(c) For purposes of this section, “personal information” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1798.81.5 of the Civil Code.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “third party” does not include a contractor providing software services to a licensee for the purpose of conducting a transaction or verifying eligibility, provided that the contractor does not use or retain a consumer’s personal information for any other purpose or share a consumer’s personal information with any party other than the contracting licensee.

(e) This section provides
 greater protection to personal information than that provided by Section 1798.81.5 of the Civil Code, which does not apply to licensees under this division pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 1798.81.5 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 2402)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

26162.

(a) Information identifying the names of patients, their medical conditions, or the names of their primary caregivers received and contained in records kept by the office or the department for the purposes of administering this chapter are confidential and shall not be disclosed pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except as necessary for authorized employees of the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this chapter, or a local ordinance.

(b) Information identifying the names of patients, their medical conditions, or the names of
 their primary caregivers received and contained in records kept by the department for the purposes of administering this chapter shall be maintained in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code, and other state and federal laws relating to confidential patient information.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes the following:

(1) Employees of the department notifying state or local agencies about information submitted to the agency that the employee suspects is falsified or fraudulent.

(2) Notifications from the department to state or local agencies about apparent violations of this
 division or applicable local ordinance.

(3) Verification of requests by state or local agencies to confirm licenses and certificates issued by the department or other state agency.

(4) Provision of information requested pursuant to a court order or subpoena issued by a court or an administrative agency or local governing body authorized by law to issue subpoenas.

(d) Information shall not be disclosed by any state or local agency beyond what is necessary to achieve the goals of a specific investigation, notification, or the parameters of a specific court order or subpoena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 19.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26162.5.

(a) Identification cards issued pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code are hereby deemed “medical information” within the meaning of the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code) and shall not be disclosed by a licensee except as (1) necessary for the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform official duties pursuant to this chapter, Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) and Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or a local ordinance, or (2) to a contractor providing software services to a licensee for the purpose of conducting a transaction or verifying eligibility,
 provided that the contractor does not use or retain medical information for any other purpose or share information with any party other than the contracting licensee.

(b) Information contained in a physician’s recommendation issued in accordance with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 and received by a licensee, including, but not limited to, the name, address, or social security number of the patient, the patient’s medical condition, or the name of the patient’s primary caregiver is hereby deemed “medical information” within the meaning of the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code) and shall not be disclosed by a licensee except as (1) necessary for the State of California or any city, county, or city and county to perform
 official duties pursuant to this chapter, Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) and Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or a local ordinance, or (2) to a contractor providing software services to a licensee for the purpose of conducting a transaction or verifying eligibility, provided that the contractor does not use or retain medical information for any other purpose or share information with any party other than the contracting licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 837, Sec. 7.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26163.

(a) The department shall, upon the request of the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board, furnish to the board, as applicable, the following information with respect to every licensee:

(1) Licensee.

(2) Licensee’s physical and mailing addresses.

(3) Federal employer identification number if the licensee is a partnership, or the licensee’s individual taxpayer identification number or social security number for all other
 licensees.

(4) Type of license.

(5) Effective date of license or a renewal.

(6) Expiration date of license.

(7) Whether license is active or inactive, if known.

(b) Information shared with the CalSavers Retirement Savings Board shall be used only for the purposes of administering the CalSavers Retirement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 80.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18. License Fees [26180. - 26181.]

26180.

The department shall establish a scale of application, licensing, and renewal fees, based upon the cost of enforcing this division, as follows:

(a) The department shall charge each licensee a licensure and renewal fee, as applicable. The licensure and renewal fee shall be calculated to cover the costs of administering this division. The licensure fee may
 vary depending upon the varying costs associated with administering the various regulatory requirements of this division as they relate to the nature and scope of the different licensure activities, including, but not limited to, the track and trace program required pursuant to Section 26067, but shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs to the department.

(b) The total fees assessed pursuant to this division shall be set at an amount that will fairly and proportionately generate sufficient total revenue to fully cover the total costs of administering this division.

(c) All license fees shall be set on a scaled basis by the department, dependent on the size of the business.

(d) The department shall deposit all fees collected in a fee account to be established in the Cannabis Control Fund. Moneys in the fee account shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the department for the administration of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 81.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26181.

The State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and other agencies may establish fees to cover the costs of their cannabis programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 98.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19. Annual Reports; Performance Audit [26190. - 26191.]

26190.

Beginning on March 1, 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature an annual report on the department’s activities, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and post the report on the department’s internet website. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for the previous fiscal year:

(a) The amount of funds allocated and spent by the department for cannabis licensing, enforcement, and administration.

(b) The number of state licenses issued, renewed, denied, suspended, and revoked, by state license category.

(c) The average time for processing state license applications, by state license category.

(d) The number of appeals from the denial of state licenses or other disciplinary actions taken by the department and the average time spent on these appeals.

(e) The number of complaints submitted by citizens or representatives of cities or counties regarding licensees, provided as both a comprehensive statewide number and by geographical region.

(f) The number and type of enforcement activities conducted by the department and by local law enforcement agencies in conjunction with the department.

(g) The number, type, and amount of penalties, fines, and other disciplinary actions taken by the department.

(h) The number of licenses on which the department imposed conditions and the categories of conditions imposed on licenses.

(i) A detailed list of the petitions for regulatory relief or rulemaking changes received by the department from licensees requesting modifications of the enforcement of rules under this division.

(j) A list of interstate cannabis agreements entered into pursuant to Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 26300), including information regarding the terms and conditions of each agreement, the activities undertaken by state agencies to implement the agreement, and the effects of the
 agreement on California’s cannabis industry. 

(k) (1) For the first publication of the reports, the department shall provide a joint report to the Legislature regarding the state of the cannabis market in California. This report shall identify any statutory or regulatory changes necessary to ensure that the implementation of this division does not do any of the following:

(A) Allow unreasonable restraints on competition by creation or maintenance of unlawful monopoly power.

(B) Perpetuate the presence of an illegal market for cannabis or cannabis products in the state or out of the state.

(C) Encourage underage use or adult abuse of cannabis
 or cannabis products, or illegal diversion of cannabis or cannabis products out of the state.

(D) Result in an excessive concentration of licensees in a given city, county, or both.

(E) Present an unreasonable risk of minors being exposed to cannabis or cannabis products.

(F) Result in violations of any environmental protection laws.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “excessive concentration” means when the premises for a retail license, microbusiness license, or a license issued under Section 26070.5 is located in an area where either of the following conditions exist:

(A) The ratio of
 licensees to population in a census tract or census division exceeds the ratio of licensees to population in the county in which the census tract or census division is located, unless reduction of that ratio would unduly limit the development of the legal market so as to perpetuate the illegal market for cannabis or cannabis products.

(B) The ratio of retail licenses, microbusiness licenses, or licenses under Section 26070.5 to population in the census tract, division, or jurisdiction exceeds that allowable by local ordinance adopted under Section 26200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 396, Sec. 2.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26190.5.

The department shall contract with the California Cannabis Research Program, known as the Center for Medicinal Cannabis Research, and formerly known as the California Marijuana Research Program, authorized pursuant to Section 11362.9 of the Health and Safety Code, to develop a study that identifies the impact that cannabis has on motor skills.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 83.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26191.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2022, and by January 1 triennially thereafter, the Office of State Audits and Evaluations within the Department of Finance shall conduct a performance audit of the department’s activities under this division, and shall report its findings to the department and the Legislature by July 1 of that same year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The actual costs of the program.

(2) The overall effectiveness of enforcement programs.

(3) Any report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) The Legislature shall provide sufficient funds to the Department of Finance to conduct the triennial audit required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 84.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20. Local Control [26200. - 26202.]

26200.

(a) (1) Except as set forth in the Medicinal Cannabis Patients’ Right of Access Act (Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 26320)), this division shall not be interpreted to supersede or limit the authority of a local jurisdiction to adopt and enforce local ordinances to regulate businesses licensed under this division, including, but not limited to, local zoning and land use requirements, business license requirements, and requirements related to reducing exposure to secondhand smoke, or to completely prohibit the establishment or operation of one or more types of businesses licensed under this division within the local jurisdiction.

(2) Except as set forth in the
 Medicinal Cannabis Patients’ Right of Access Act (Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 26320)), this division shall not be interpreted to supersede or limit existing local authority for law enforcement activity, enforcement of local zoning requirements or local ordinances, or enforcement of local license, permit, or other authorization requirements.

(b) This division shall not be interpreted to require the department to undertake local law enforcement responsibilities, enforce local zoning requirements, or enforce local licensing, permitting, or other authorization requirements.

(c) A local jurisdiction shall notify the department upon revocation of any local license, permit, or authorization for a licensee to engage in commercial cannabis activity within the local jurisdiction.
 Within 60 days of being so informed, the department shall begin the process to determine whether a license issued to the licensee should be suspended or revoked pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 26030).

(d) For facilities issued a state license that are located within the incorporated area of a city, the city shall have full power and authority to enforce this division and the regulations promulgated by the department, if delegated by the state. Notwithstanding Sections 101375, 101400, and 101405 of the Health and Safety Code or any contract entered into pursuant thereto, or any other law, the city shall assume complete responsibility for any regulatory function pursuant to this division within the city limits that would otherwise be performed by the county or any county officer or employee, including a county health
 officer, without liability, cost, or expense to the county.

(e) (1) This division does not prohibit the issuance of a state temporary event license to a licensee authorizing onsite cannabis sales to, and consumption by, persons 21 years of age or older at a county fair event, district agricultural association event, or at another venue expressly approved by a local jurisdiction for the purpose of holding temporary events of this nature, provided that the activities, at a minimum, comply with all the following:

(A) The requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(B) All participants who are engaged in the onsite retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products at the
 event are licensed under this
 division to engage in that activity.

(C) The activities are otherwise consistent with regulations promulgated and adopted by the department governing state temporary event licenses, except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (6), (7), and (8).

(D) A state temporary event license shall only be issued in local jurisdictions that authorize such events.

(E) A licensee who submits an application for a state temporary event license shall, 60 days before the event, provide to the department a list of all licensees that will be providing onsite sales of cannabis or cannabis products at the event. If any changes occur in that list, the licensee shall provide the department with a final updated list to reflect
 those changes. A person shall not engage in the onsite retail sale of cannabis or cannabis products, or in any way participate in the event, who is not included in the list, including any updates, provided to the department.

(2) The department may impose a civil penalty on any person who violates this subdivision, or any regulations adopted by the department governing state temporary event licenses, in an amount up to three times the amount of the license fee for each violation, consistent with Sections 26018 and 26038.

(3) The department may require the event and all participants to cease operations without delay if in the opinion of the department or local law enforcement it is necessary to protect the immediate public health and safety of the people of the state. The department
 may also require the event organizer to immediately expel from the event any participant selling cannabis or cannabis products without a license from the department that authorizes the participant to sell cannabis or cannabis products. If the unlicensed participant does not leave the event, the department may require the event and all participants to cease operations immediately.

(4) The order by the department for the event to cease operations pursuant to paragraph (3) does not entitle the event organizer or any participant in the event to a hearing or an appeal of the decision. Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 490) of Division 1.5 and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26040) of this division shall not apply to the order by the department for the event to cease operations pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) The smoking of cannabis or cannabis products at temporary events authorized pursuant to this subdivision is prohibited in locations where smoking is prohibited. For purposes of this section, “smoking” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5.

(6) (A) All licensees who are issued a state temporary event license allowed pursuant to this subdivision may, upon completion or cessation of the temporary event, reconcile unsold inventory of cannabis or cannabis products and return it to the licensee’s retail premises.

(B) All unsold inventory of cannabis or cannabis products from the temporary event shall be noted in track and trace prior to transport.

(C) All unsold inventory of cannabis or cannabis products from the temporary event shall be in its original packaging in which it was placed pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 26120).

(7) The inventory of cannabis or cannabis products authorized to be sold by a state temporary event license pursuant to this subdivision shall only be transported to and from the temporary event by a licensed distributor or licensed microbusiness.

(8) The department shall not deny an application for a state temporary event license pursuant to this subdivision solely on the basis that there is a license issued pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000)) for the proposed premises of the event. Furthermore, the Department of
 Alcoholic Beverage Control shall not take any disciplinary action against a person licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act on the basis of a state temporary event license issued by the department to a licensee pursuant to this subdivision that utilizes the same premises as the person licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(A) All on- and off-sale privileges of alcoholic beverages at the venue shall be suspended for the day of the event and shall not resume until 6 a.m. on the day after the event has ended.

(B) Alcohol consumption on the venue premises shall be strictly prohibited for the day of the event and shall not resume until 6 a.m. on the day after the event has ended.

(f) This
 division, or any regulations promulgated thereunder, shall not be deemed to limit the authority or remedies of a city, county, or city and county under any provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 7 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11362.3 of the Health and Safety Code, if all of the conditions in paragraph (2) are met, a local jurisdiction may allow for any of the following:

(A) Smoking, vaporizing, and ingesting of cannabis or cannabis products on the premises of a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division that has been granted authority by a local jurisdiction to engage in onsite cannabis consumption.

(B) Preparation or sale of noncannabis food or beverage products in compliance with all applicable provisions of the California Retail Food Code (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 113700) of Part 7 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code) by a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division in the area where the consumption of cannabis is allowed.

(C) Live musical or other performances on the premises of a retailer or microbusiness licensed under this division in the area where the consumption of cannabis is allowed, and the sale of tickets for those performances.

(2) A local jurisdiction may allow any of the activities provided in paragraph (1) if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) Access to the area where cannabis consumption is allowed is restricted to persons 21 years of age or older and each entrance to the area prominently posts a warning that cannabis consumption, including smoking of cannabis, is permitted inside.

(B) Cannabis consumption is not visible from any public place or nonage-restricted area.

(C) Sale or consumption of alcohol or tobacco is not allowed on the premises.
